Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202379-254
Act, how cited.

Sections 79-254 to 79-294 shall be known and may be cited as the Student Discipline Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 6;

Laws 1995, LB 658, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-4,169;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 58;

Laws 1999, LB 195, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 58.
July 1, 2023
Gun-free school zones, see section 28-1204.04.

Membership in secret school organization, grounds for denial of school privileges, see section 79-2,101 et seq.

School officials' statutory authority to conduct searches of students is implied by the Student Discipline Act. J.P. v. Millard Public Schools, 285 Neb. 890, 830 N.W.2d 453 (2013).